District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.05

Purpose of the Department.

The Department shall:

(1)

Ensure the provision of high-quality behavioral health services by establishing District-wide behavioral health standards and policies;

(2)

Foster and promote behavioral health education and disease prevention;

(3)

Provide high-quality prevention, treatment, and recovery support services related to mental health disorders, addictions, and the abuse of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs in the District;

(4)

Develop and maintain an efficient and cost-effective behavioral health care financing system; and

(5)

Implement, monitor, and evaluate the District’s strategic behavioral health plan.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5116, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 7-1141.03.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5116 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5116 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.